miscellaneous/esperanto-adjectives.lexc
LEXICON Root
        Adjectives ;
        AdjPrefix ;

LEXICON AdjPrefix
mal     Adjectives ;
ne      Adjectives ;

LEXICON Adjectives
bon     Adj ;
long    Adj ;
alt     Adj ;
grav    Adj ;
jun     Adj ;

LEXICON Adj
et      Adj;
eg      Adj;
        Adjend ;


LEXICON Adjend
a       Number ;

LEXICON Number 
j       Case ;
        Case ;

LEXICON Case 
n       # ;
        # ;
